Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-352
Monuments; markers; inscription.

Said monuments or markers shall have thereon a suitable inscription indicating the purpose for which the monument or marker is erected.

Laws 1927, c. 52, § 2, p. 207;

C.S.1929, § 26-802;

R.S.1943, § 23-352.